Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.065

Licensed custom farm slaughterer—Transport of offal.

A licensed custom farm slaughterer may transport the offal of a meat food animal he or she has slaughtered for the owner, when it is transported as part of a slaughtering transaction and the offal is handled in a sanitary manner.

[ 2000 c 99 s 7; 1967 ex.s. c 120 s 4. Formerly RCW 16.49.451.]